fr: Matériau de remplissage: Écales de sarrasin; Coton; Duvet; Plumes; Feutre; Polaire; Mousse à mémoire de forme; Microbeads; Rembourré; Polyester; Polystyrène (PS); Polyuréthane (PU); Synthétique; Laine; Autre
bg-BG: Материал на пълнежа: Люспи от елда; Памук; Пух; Пера; Филц; Полар; Мемори пяна; Микрогранули; Плюш; Полиестер; Полистирол (PS); Полиуретан (PU); Синтетичен; Вълна; Други
sk-SK: Výplňový materiál: Pohánkové šupky; Bavlna; Páperové pierko; Perie; Plsť; Flís; Pamäťová pena; Mikroperličky; Plyš; Polyester; Polystyrén (PS); Polyuretán (PU); Syntetický; Vlna; Iné
el: Υλικό γεμίσματος: Τσόφλια φαγόπυρου; Βαμβάκι; Πουπουλένιο φτερό; Φτερά; Τσόχα; Φλις; Αφρός μνήμης; Μικροσφαιρίδια; Πλούσα; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυστυρένιο (PS); Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Συνθετικό; Μαλλί; Άλλο
ko: 충진 소재: 메밀 껍질; 면; 솜털; 깃털; 펠트; 플리스; 메모리 폼; 마이크로비즈; 푹신함; 폴리에스테르; 폴리스티렌(PS); 폴리우레탄(PU); 인조; 울; 기타
de: Füllstoff: Buchweizenschalen; Baumwolle; Daune; Federn; Filz; Vlies; Memoryschaum; Mikroperlen; Plüsch; Polyester; Polystyrol (PS); Polyurethan (PU); Synthetisch; Wolle; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Material polnila: Ajdove luščine; Bombaž; Puhovo pero; Perje; Filc; Flis; Spominska pena; Mikroperle; Pliš; Poliester; Polistiren (PS); Poliuretan (PU); Sintetika; Volna; Drugo
zh-CN: 填充材料: 荞麦壳; 棉布; 羽绒; 羽毛; 毛毡; 羊毛; 记忆海绵; 微珠; 柔软; 聚酯纤维; 聚苯乙烯 (PS); 聚氨酯 (PU); 合成; 羊毛; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal ispune: Heljdine ljuske; Pamuk; Paperje; Perje; Filc; Flis; Memorijska pjena; Mikrozrnca; Pliš; Poliester; Polistiren (PS); Poliuretan (PU); Sintetika; Vuna; Ostalo
pt-BR: Material de enchimento: Cascas de trigo sarraceno; Algodão; Penugem; Penas; Sentido; Lã; Espuma de memória; Microesferas; Pelúcia; Poliéster; Poliestireno (PS); Poliuretano (PU); Sintético; Lã; Outro
zh-TW: 填充材質: 蕎麥殼; 棉布; 羽絨; 羽毛; 毛氈; 刷毛布; 記憶棉; 微珠; 毛絨; 聚酯; 聚苯乙烯 (PS); 聚氨酯 (PU); 合成; 羊毛; 其他
th: วัสดุเติม: เปลือกบัควีต; สำลี; ขนอ่อน; ขนนก; ผ้าสักหลาด; ผ้าขนแกะ; เมมโมรีโฟม; ไมโครบีดส์; ขนนุ่ม; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิสไตรีน (PS); โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); สังเคราะห์; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
hu: Töltőanyag: Hajdinahéj; Pamut; Pehelytoll; Toll; Filc; Gyapjú; Memóriahab; Mikrogyöngyök; Plüss; Poliészter; Polisztirol (PS); Poliuretán (PU); Szintetikus; Gyapjú; Egyéb
sv: Fyllnadsmaterial: Boveteskal; Bomull; Dunfjäder; Fjädrar; Filt; Fleece; Minnesskum; Mikropärlor; Plysch; Polyester; Polystyren (PS); Polyuretan (PU); Syntetisk; Ylle; Övrigt
cs: Materiál výplně: Pohankové slupky; Bavlna; Prachové peří; Peří; Plst; Flís; Paměťová pěna; Mikrokuličky; Plyšový; Polyester; Polystyren (PS); Polyuretan (PU); Syntetické; Vlna; Jiné
da: Fyldmateriale: Boghvedefrø; Bomuld; Dunfjer; Fjer; Filt; Fleece; Memoryskum; Mikroperler; Plys; Polyester; Polystyren (PS); Polyurethan (PU); Syntetisk; Uld; Andet
pt-PT: Material de enchimento: Trigo-sarraceno; Algodão; Penugem; Penas; Feltro; Velo; Material viscoelástico; Microesferas; Peluche; Poliéster; Poliestireno (PS); Poliuretano (PU); Sintético; Lã; Outro
pl: Materiał wypełniający: Łuski gryki; Bawełna; Pierze; Pióra; Filc; Polar; Pianka pamięciowa; Mikrosfery; Plusz; Poliester; Polistyren (PS); Poliuretan (PU); Syntetyczne; Wełna; Inne
ja: 充填材: そば殻; コットン; ダウンフェザー; フェザー; フェルト; フリース; メモリーフォーム; マイクロビーズ; プラッシュ; ポリエステル; ポリスチレン (PS); ポリウレタン (PU); 合成品; ウール; その他
es: Material de relleno: Granos de alforfón; Algodón; Plumón; Plumas; Fieltro; Vellón; Espuma viscoelástica; Microperlas; Felpa; Poliéster; Poliestireno (PS); Poliuretano (PU); Sintético; Lana; Otros
lt-LT: Užpildo medžiaga: Grikių lukštai; Medvilnė; Pūkinė plunksna; Plunksnos; Veltinis; Flisas; Formą išsaugantis porolonas; Mikrokaroliukai; Pliušas; Poliesteris; Polistirenas (PS); Poliuretanas (PU); Sintetika; Vilna; Kita
nb: Fyllmateriale: Bokhveteskall; Bomull; Dunfjær; Fjær; Filt; Fleece; Minneskum; Mikroperler; Plysj; Polyester; Polystyren (PS); Polyuretan (PU); Syntetisk; Ull; Annet
it: Materiale dell’imbottitura: Gusci di grano saraceno; Cotone; Piumino; Piume; Feltro; Felpa; Memory foam; Microsfere; Soffice; Poliestere; Polistirene (PS); Poliuretano (PU); Sintetico; Lana; Altro
fi: Täyteaineen materiaali: Tattarikuoret; Puuvilla; Untuva; Sulat; Huopa; Fleece; Muistivaahto; Mikrohelmet; Pehmo; Polyesteri; Polystyreeni (PS); Polyuretaani (PU); Synteettinen; Villa; Muu
ro-RO: Material de umplutură: Coji de hrișcă; Bumbac; Pene de puf; Pene; Pâslă; Polar; Spumă cu memorie; Microbile; Pluș; Poliester; Polistiren (PS); Poliuretan (PU); Sintetic; Lână; Altele
nl: Vulmateriaal: Boekweitschillen; Katoen; Donsveer; Veren; Vilt; Fleece; Traagschuim; Microkorrels; Pluche; Polyester; Polystyreen (PS); Polyurethaan (PU); Synthetisch; Wol; Andere
vi: Vật liệu làm đầy: Vỏ kiều mạch; Vải bông; Lông vũ; Lông vũ; Nỉ; Nỉ cào; Cao su non; Hạt vi nhựa; Lông nhung; Polyester; Polystyrene (PS); Polyurethane (PU); Tổng hợp; Len; Khác
en: Filler material: Buckwheat hulls; Cotton; Down feather; Feathers; Felt; Fleece; Memory foam; Microbeads; Plush; Polyester; Polystyrene (PS); Polyurethane (PU); Synthetic; Wool; Other
tr: Dolgu malzemesi: Karabuğday kabuğu; Pamuk; Kuş tüyü; Tüyler; Keçe; Yapağı; Hafızalı köpük; Mikroboncuklar; Peluş; Poliyester; Polistiren (PS); Poliüretan (PU); Sentetik; Yünlüler; Diğer
ru: Материал наполнителя: Гречневая шелуха; Хлопок; Пуховое перо; Перо; Фетр; Флис; Пена с эффектом памяти; Микрошарики; Плюш; Полиэстер; Полистирол (ПС); Полиуретан (ПУ); Синтетика; Шерсть; Другой